New York, session 2025-2026, A10858.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 2805-b-1 to read as follows: 3 § 2805-b-1. Social admission of minors. 1. As used in this section, 4 the term "hospital" shall include hospitals and general hospitals as 5 such terms are defined in subdivisions one and ten of section twenty- 6 eight hundred one of this article. 7 2. (a) A hospital shall admit a minor to an appropriate inpatient unit 8 under a social admission status when: 9 (i) such minor presents to a hospital emergency department or emergen- 10 cy crisis unit for evaluation of mental or behavioral health concerns; 11 (ii) such minor receives a comprehensive evaluation within no more 12 than twenty-four hours of their arrival at such hospital; 13 (iii) the psychiatric or crisis team evaluating such minor determines 14 that such minor does not meet clinical criteria for inpatient psychiat- 15 ric admission and is medically cleared for discharge; and 16 (iv) the parent or legal guardian of such minor or the local social 17 services district refuses or fails to retrieve such minor, effectively 18 abandoning such minor at the hospital. 19 (b) Admission of a minor under a social admission status pursuant to 20 this subdivision shall be for custodial and safety purposes and shall 21 not be based on psychiatric medical necessity. 22 3. Upon admitting a minor under a social admission status pursuant to 23 subdivision two of this section, the hospital admitting such minor shall 24 immediately notify the appropriate local social services district and/or 25 local child protective service and shall coordinate with the local child EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15198-01-6 A. 10858 2 1 protective service to determine and secure a safe and appropriate place- 2 ment for such minor. 3 4. Assigned caseworkers shall review the cases of minors admitted 4 pursuant to subdivision two of this section on an ongoing basis to 5 ensure such minors do not remain under inpatient social admission status 6 at a hospital indefinitely. 7 5. Hospitals shall report quarterly to the local child protective 8 service, the office of children and family services, the department, and 9 all stakeholders, information on the number of social admissions made 10 pursuant to this section, the length of stay of minors admitted pursuant 11 to this section, and disposition outcomes of social admissions made 12 pursuant to this section, for the purpose of informing policy and 13 resource allocation. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 15 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the department of 16 health and the office of children and family services are authorized to 17 promulgate any rules and regulations necessary for the timely implemen- 18 tation of this act on or before such effective date.